New York, session 2025-2026, S6241.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph (i) of paragraph (a) of subdivision 4 of 2 section 502 of the vehicle and traffic law, as amended by chapter 379 of 3 the laws of 2022, is amended to read as follows: 4 (i) Upon submission of an application for a driver's license, the 5 applicant shall be required to take and pass a test, or submit evidence 6 of passage of a test, with respect to the laws relating to traffic, the 7 laws relating to driving while ability is impaired and while intoxicat- 8 ed, under the overpowering influence of "Road Rage", "Work Zone Safety" 9 awareness, "Motorcycle Safety" awareness and "Pedestrian and Bicyclist 10 Safety" awareness as defined by the commissioner, "School Bus Safety" 11 awareness, the law relating to exercising due care to avoid colliding 12 with a parked, stopped or standing authorized emergency vehicle or 13 hazard vehicle pursuant to section eleven hundred forty-four-a of this 14 chapter, the ability to read and comprehend traffic signs and symbols 15 and such other matters as the commissioner may prescribe, and to satis- 16 factorily complete a course prescribed by the commissioner of not less 17 than four hours and not more than [five] six hours, consisting of class- 18 room driver training and highway safety instruction or the equivalent 19 thereof. Such test shall include at least seven written questions 20 concerning the effects of consumption of alcohol or drugs on the ability 21 of a person to operate a motor vehicle and the legal and financial 22 consequences resulting from violations of section eleven hundred nine- 23 ty-two of this chapter, prohibiting the operation of a motor vehicle 24 while under the influence of alcohol or drugs. Such test shall include EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00857-01-5 S. 6241 2 1 one or more written questions concerning the devastating effects of 2 "Road Rage" on the ability of a person to operate a motor vehicle and 3 the legal and financial consequences resulting from assaulting, threat- 4 ening or interfering with the lawful conduct of another person legally 5 using the roadway. Such test shall include one or more questions 6 concerning the potential dangers to persons and equipment resulting from 7 the unsafe operation of a motor vehicle in a work zone. Such test may 8 include one or more questions concerning motorcycle safety. Such test 9 may include one or more questions concerning the law for exercising due 10 care to avoid colliding with a parked, stopped or standing vehicle 11 pursuant to section eleven hundred forty-four-a of this chapter. Such 12 test may include one or more questions concerning school bus safety. 13 Such test may include one or more questions concerning pedestrian and 14 bicyclist safety. Such test shall be administered by the commissioner. 15 The commissioner shall cause the applicant to take a vision test and a 16 test for color blindness. Upon passage of the vision test, the applica- 17 tion may be accepted and the application fee shall be payable. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.